Alaska, session 34, HB182.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 04.09.320(e) is amended to read: 05 (e) Except as provided under (g) of this section [AND AS 04.09.700], the 06 holder of a brewery retail license may not 07 (1) allow live music or performances, disc jockeys, karaoke, 08 televisions, pool tables, dart games, or organized games or tournaments on the 09 premises where the consumption occurs; 10 (2) provide seats at the counter or bar where the brewed beverages are 11 served; 12 (3) open the room where the consumption occurs before 9:00 a.m.; or 13 (4) serve brewed beverages after 9:00 p.m. 14 * Sec. 2. AS 04.09.320(g) is amended to read: 01 (g) The holder of a brewery retail license may allow on the premises where the 02 consumption occurs 03 (1) activities, presentations, television or video displays, or other 04 displays that directly promote or educate customers about the brewery's products, 05 processes, or establishment; [AND] 06 (2) other community organizations or businesses to provide 07 presentations, classes, or product displays or host fundraisers; and 08 (3) not more than four live music events or other entertainment 09 performances in a calendar year. 10 * Sec. 3. AS 04.09.330(e) is amended to read: 11 (e) Except as provided under (g) of this section [AND AS 04.09.700], the 12 holder of a winery retail license may not 13 (1) allow live music or performances, disc jockeys, karaoke, 14 televisions, pool tables, dart games, or organized games or tournaments on the 15 premises where the consumption occurs; 16 (2) provide seats at the counter or bar where the wine is served; 17 (3) open the room where the consumption occurs before 9:00 a.m.; or 18 (4) serve wine after 9:00 p.m. 19 * Sec. 4. AS 04.09.330(g) is amended to read: 20 (g) The holder of a winery retail license may allow on the premises where the 21 consumption occurs 22 (1) activities, presentations, television or video displays, or other 23 displays that directly promote or educate customers about the winery's products, 24 processes, or establishment; [AND] 25 (2) other community organizations or businesses to provide 26 presentations, classes, or product displays or host fundraisers; and 27 (3) not more than four live music events or other entertainment 28 performances in a calendar year. 29 * Sec. 5. AS 04.09.340(e) is amended to read: 30 (e) Except as provided under (g) of this section [AND AS 04.09.700], the 31 holder of a distillery retail license may not 01 (1) allow live music or performances, disc jockeys, karaoke, 02 televisions, pool tables, dart games, or organized games or tournaments on the 03 premises where the consumption occurs; 04 (2) provide seats at the counter or bar where the distilled spirits are 05 served; 06 (3) open the room where the consumption occurs before 9:00 a.m.; or 07 (4) serve distilled spirits after 9:00 p.m. 08 * Sec. 6. AS 04.09.340(g) is amended to read: 09 (g) The holder of a distillery retail license may allow on the premises where 10 the consumption occurs 11 (1) activities, presentations, television or video displays, or other 12 displays that directly promote or educate customers about the distillery's products, 13 processes, or establishment; [AND] 14 (2) other community organizations or businesses to provide 15 presentations, classes, or product displays or host fundraisers; and 16 (3) not more than four live music events or other entertainment 17 performances in a calendar year. 18 * Sec. 7. AS 04.09.700 is repealed. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.